Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB234.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2705(a) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended to read:Section 2705. Fees.--(a) For the purposes of funding the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and management plans authorized under this article, a township may assess reasonable and uniform fees based in whole or in part on the characteristics of the property benefited by the facilities, systems and management plans[.] as follows:(1) The fees assessed may not exceed the amount necessary to 123456789101112131415161718 meet the minimum requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (62 Stat. 1155, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), and Federal or State laws governing the implementation of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, for the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and management plans, as specified in 40 CFR 122.26 (relating to storm water discharges (applicable to State NPDES programs, see § 123.25)).(2) In establishing the fees, the township shall consider and provide appropriate exemptions or credits for properties which have installed and are maintaining storm water facilities that meet best management practices and are approved or inspected by the township[.] and, in the case of a normal agricultural operation, best management practices approved by the United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service or the State Conservation Commission.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0234PN0187 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718